Louisiana, session 2026, SB81.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. Code of Criminal Procedure Art. 780(C) is hereby amended and reenacted
to read as follows:
Art. 780. Right to waive trial by jury
* * *
C. With the consent of the district attorney the defendant may waive trial by
jury within forty-five days prior to the commencement of trial The court shall deny
a defendant's motion to waive a jury trial unless the prosecuting authority
provides written consent to the waiver.
* * *
Section 2. This Act shall take effect and become operative if and when the proposed
amendment to Article I, Section 17(A) of the Constitution of Louisiana contained in the Act
which originated as Senate Bill No. 97 of the 2026 Regular Session of the Legislature is
finally adopted at a statewide election and becomes effective.
PRESIDENT OF THE SENATE
SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF LOUISIANA
APPROVED:
Page 1 of 1
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.